Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,214
Debt; submission for collection; when.

The Department of Motor Vehicles may submit any debt of twenty-five dollars or more to the Department of Revenue for collection pursuant to sections 77-27,210 to 77-27,221 except when the validity of the debt has not been finally determined by the debtor's exercise or failure to exercise all applicable appeal rights.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 29.